Utah statutes.
77-38-204.   Disclosure of confidential communications.

The confidential communication between a victim and a sexual assault counselor is available to a third person only when:

(1)  the victim is a minor and the counselor believes it is in the best interest of the victim to disclose the confidential communication to the victim's parents;

(2)  the victim is a minor and the minor's parents or guardian have consented to disclosure of the confidential communication to a third party based upon representations made by the counselor that it is in the best interest of the minor victim to make such disclosure;

(3)  the victim is not a minor, has given consent, and the counselor believes the disclosure is necessary to accomplish the desired result of counseling; or

(4)  the counselor has an obligation under Title 62A, Chapter 4a, Child and Family Services, to report information transmitted in the confidential communication.

